Louisiana, session 2026, SB472.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2159.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2159.3. Sober living homes
The Louisiana Department of Health shall develop minimum health and
safety standards for sober living homes. Prior to initiating rulemaking pursuant
to the Administrative Procedure Act, the department shall submit the standards
to the Senate and House health and welfare committees for review and
approval.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1109 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 472